Maryland, session 2025, SB0526.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–801.
(b) (1) At its own expense, a county governing body may provide
transportation for public school students in addition to the transportation provided by the
State.
(E) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “SAFE ALTERNATIVE ROUTE” INCLUDES:
(I) A ROAD WITH SIDEWALKS AND, AT INTERSECTIONS,
CROSSWALKS;
(II) A FOOT PATH; AND
(III) A BIKE PATH.
(2) EACH YEAR, A COUNTY BOARD SHALL PREPARE A REPORT THAT
IDENTIFIES:
(I) FOR EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY, THOSE AREAS
OF THE COUNTY WHERE A STUDENT WHO IS REGULARLY ASSIGNED TO THE SCHOOL
WOULD BE INELIGIBLE FOR TRANSPORTATION SERVICES BASED ON THE DISTANCE
BETWEEN A RESIDENCE AND THE SCHOOL; AND
(II) PATHWAYS THAT A STUDENT RESIDING IN AN AREA
IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY USE TO TRAVEL BETWEEN
THE STUDENT’S RESIDENCE AND REGULARLY ASSIGNED SCHOOL USING ONLY A
SAFE ALTERNATIVE ROUTE OR A CONTIGUOUS SERIES OF SAFE ALTERNATIVE
ROUTES.
(3) THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL POST TO THE COUNTY’S WEBSITE
EACH REPORT PREPARED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
Article – Local Government
12–506.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SAFE ALTERNATIVE ROUTE” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 7–801 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 526 3
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL COUNTIES.
(C) EACH YEAR, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY SHALL:
(1) REVIEW THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER § 7–801(E)(2) OF THE
EDUCATION ARTICLE; AND
(2) CONSTRUCT ANY SIDEWALKS AND CROSSWALKS NECESSARY TO
CREATE SAFE ALTERNATIVE ROUTES FOR STUDENTS AS IDENTIFIED IN THE REPORT.
(D) IF THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MUST ALTER A ROAD THAT IS
NOT SUBJECT TO THE JURISDICTION OF THE COUNTY IN ORDER TO MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP A PLAN WITH THE GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY OR PERSON
THAT HAS CONTROL OF THE ROAD; AND
(2) MAKE REASONABLE EFFORTS TO EXECUTE THE PLAN IN AN
EXPEDITIOUS MANNER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.